Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:(1) Washington state administers a wide range of programs that distribute public funds, deliver critical services, and rely on partnerships with local governments, nonprofits, and private entities. Maintaining strong public trust in these programs requires proactive oversight and effective risk management practices that evolve as programs, technology, and service delivery models change.(2) Recent national attention on fraud in publicly funded programs underscores the importance of regularly assessing areas of risk before problems become systemic.(3) While Washington has existing audit and accountability mechanisms, the legislature recognizes the value of an assessment of these mechanisms and their effectiveness in identifying gaps and opportunities for improvement.(4) It is the intent of the legislature to promote transparency and efficient use of oversight resources by directing the joint legislative audit and review committee to evaluate current practices, compare them to other states, and provide options to strengthen the oversight of state programs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review auditing, accountability, and risk management practices across Washington's state agencies. The review may consider:(a) Existing internal controls, oversight processes, a sample of state programs that oversee and administer grants, loans and contracts, and the role of the state auditor, internal auditors within agencies, and the office of financial management in preventing fraud, waste, abuse, and mismanagement;(b) Gaps, weaknesses, or inefficiencies in current auditing and accountability practices;(c) A comparison of Washington's auditing and accountability practices to those of other states, highlighting models, strategies, or tools that have proven effective elsewhere; and(d) Options for enhancing statewide accountability that are produced in clear and accessible language, highlighting actionable steps that could improve accountability and stewardship of public funds.(2) The committee shall report on the results of the performance audit, including findings and recommendations, to the legislature by September 1, 2027.(3) This section expires October 1, 2027.--- END ---